Utah statutes.
73-1-16.   Petition for hearing to determine validity -- Notice -- Service
-- Pleading -- Costs -- Review.
Where any water users' association, irrigation company, canal company, ditch
company, reservoir company, or other corporation of like character or purpose,
organized under the laws of this state has entered into or proposes to enter
into a contract with the United States for the payment by such association or
company of the construction and other charges of a federal reclamation project
constructed, under construction, or to be constructed within this state, and
where funds for the payment of such charges are to be obtained from
assessments levied upon the stock of such association or company, or where a
lien is created or will be created against any of the land, property, canals,
water rights or other assets of such association or company or against the
land, property, canals, water rights or other assets of any stockholder of
such association or company to secure the payment of construction or other
charges of a reclamation project, the water users' association, irrigation
company, canal company, ditch company, reservoir company or other corporation
of like character or purpose may file in the district court of the county
wherein is situated the office of such association or company a petition
entitled ".......... Water Users' Association" or ".......... Company," as the
case may be, "against the stockholders of said association or company and the
owners and mortgagees of land within the .......... Federal Reclamation
Project."  No other or more specific description of the defendants shall be
required.  In the petition it may be stated that the water users' association,
irrigation company, canal company, ditch company, reservoir company or other
corporation of like character and purpose has entered into or proposes to
enter into a contract with the United States, to be set out in full in said
petition, with a prayer that the court find said contract to be valid, and a
modification of any individual contracts between the United States and the
stockholders of such association or company, or between the association or
company, and its stockholders, so far as such individual contracts are at
variance with the contract or proposed contract between the association or
company and the United States.
Thereupon a notice in the nature of a summons shall issue under the hand and
seal of the clerk of said court, stating in brief outline the contents of said
petition, and showing where a full copy of said contract or proposed contract
may be examined, such notice to be directed to the said defendants under the
same general designations, which shall be deemed sufficient to give the court
jurisdiction of all matters involved and parties interested.  Service shall be
obtained (a)  by publication of such notice once a week for three consecutive
weeks (three times) in a newspaper published in each county where the
irrigable land of such federal reclamation project is situated, (b) as
required in Section 45-1-101 for three weeks, and (c) by the posting at least
three weeks prior to the date of the hearing on said petition of the notice
and a complete copy of the said contract or proposed contract in the office of
the plaintiff association or company, and at three other public places within
the boundaries of such federal reclamation project.  Any stockholder in the
plaintiff association or company, or owner, or mortgagee of land within said
federal reclamation project affected by the contract proposed to be made by
such association or company, may demur to or answer said petition before the
date set for such hearing or within such further time as may be allowed
therefor by the court.  The failure of any persons affected by the said
contract to answer or demur shall be construed, so far as such persons are
concerned as an acknowledgment of the validity of said contract and as a
consent to the modification of said individual contracts if any with such
association or company or with the United States, to the extent that such
modification is required to cause the said individual contracts if any to
conform to the terms of the contract or proposed contract between the
plaintiff and the United States.  All persons filing demurrers or answers
shall be entered as defendants in said cause and their defense consolidated
for hearing or trial.  Upon hearing the court shall examine all matters and
things in controversy and shall enter judgment and decree as the case
warrants, showing how and to what extent, if any, the said individual
contracts of the defendants or under which they claim are modified by the
plaintiff's contract or proposed contract with the United States.  In reaching
his conclusion in such causes, the court shall follow a liberal interpretation
of the laws, and shall disregard informalities or omissions not affecting the
substantial rights of the parties, unless it is affirmatively shown that such
informalities or omissions led to a different result than would have been
obtained otherwise.  The Code of Civil Procedure shall govern matters of
pleading and practice as nearly as may be.  Costs may be assessed or
apportioned among contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court.
Review of the judgment of the district court by the Supreme Court may be had
as in other civil causes.
